Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
PART 9
LOCAL GOVERNMENT-FINANCED ENTITY

29-1-901. Definitions.

As used in this part 9, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Local government-financed entity" means any organization, group, or entity other than a political subdivision that:

Is composed of members that are political subdivisions or who are officials or employees of political subdivisions; and

Derives any of its annual operating budget from dues, contributions, or other payments received from political subdivisions.

"Political subdivision" means a county, city and county, city, town, service authority, school district, local improvement district, law enforcement authority, water, sanitation, fire protection, metropolitan, irrigation, drainage, or other special district, or any other kind of municipal, quasi-municipal, or public corporation organized pursuant to law.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire part added, p. 140, § 1, effective April 8.

29-1-902. Local government-financed entity - records - public inspection.

A local government-financed entity shall make the following information available for public inspection and copying during regular business hours:

A list of the members of the entity;

The annual operating budget of the entity that is government financed;

The compensation paid to officers and employees of and to any other person performing services for the entity, including expense allowances and benefits;

The name of any person lobbying, as defined in section 24-6-301 (3.5), C.R.S., on behalf of the entity and the total amount expended by the entity for lobbying over the previous twelve months;

The most recent disclosure statement filed by the entity or by any person lobbying on behalf of the entity pursuant to section 24-6-302, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire part added, p. 140, § 1, effective April 8.